Nevada, session 83, SB97.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 and 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. NRS 695I.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695I.300 1. The governing authority of the Exchange is the
Board, consisting of seven voting members and three ex officio
nonvoting members.
2. Subject to the provisions of subsections 3 to 6, inclusive:
(a) The Governor shall appoint [five] :
(1) Four voting members of the Board [;] who have
expertise in an area described in subsection 3; and
(2) One voting member of the Board who is a member of an
Indian tribe which is located in this State who has expertise in
health care administration for an Indian tribe.
(b) The Senate Majority Leader shall appoint one voting
member of the Board; and
(c) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one voting
member of the Board.
3. Each voting member of the Board must have:
(a) Expertise in the sale or marketing of individual or small
employer health insurance;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) Expertise in health care administration, health care
financing, health information technology or health insurance;
(c) Expertise in the administration of health care delivery
systems;
(d) Experience as a consumer who would benefit from services
provided by the Exchange; or
(e) Experience as a consumer advocate, including, without
limitation, experience in consumer outreach and education for those
who would benefit from services provided by the Exchange.
4. When making an appointment pursuant to subsection 2, the
Governor, the Majority Leader and the Speaker of the Assembly
shall consider the collective expertise and experience of the voting
members of the Board and shall attempt to make each appointment
so that:
(a) The areas of expertise and experience described in
subsection 3 are collectively represented by the voting members of
the Board; and
(b) The voting members of the Board represent a range and
diversity of skills, knowledge, experience and geographic and
stakeholder perspectives.
5. When making an appointment pursuant to subsection 2, the
Governor, the Majority Leader and the Speaker of the Assembly
shall, as vacancies on the Board occur, ensure that not more than
two voting members of the Board represent any particular area of
expertise or experience described in paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d) or (e)
of subsection 3. The voting member described in subparagraph (2)
of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 does not represent an area of
expertise or experience described in paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d) or
(e) of subsection 3 for the purposes of this section.
6. A voting member of the Board may not be a Legislator or
hold any elective office in State Government.
7. The following are ex officio nonvoting members of the
Board who shall assist the voting members of the Board by
providing advice and expertise:
(a) The Director of the Department of Health and Human
Services, or his or her designee;
(b) The Director of the Department of Business and Industry, or
his or her designee; and
(c) The Director of the Office of Finance, or his or her designee.
8. As used in this section, “Indian tribe” means a federally
recognized American Indian tribe pursuant to 25 C.F.R. §§ 83.1 to
83.12, inclusive.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 5. The Governor shall appoint the voting member of the
Board of Directors of the Silver State Health Insurance Exchange
described in subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 695I.300, as amended by section 3 of this act, to replace the
member appointed by the Governor whose term expires on June 30,
2025.
Sec. 6. 1. This section and sections 4 and 5 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 3 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of conducting the
actuarial analysis required by paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
section 1 of this act, preparing and submitting the application for the
federal waiver described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of section
1 of this act and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2028, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)